North Dakota, session 69, HB1018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the state
historical society for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the state historical society, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $16,832,853 $3,313,454 $20,146,307
New and vacant FTE pool 0 934,276 934,276
Operating expenses 3,443,236 2,084,415 5,527,651
Capital assets 1,330,184 82,267,649 83,597,833
Grants 928,340 1,092,500 2,020,840
Cultural heritage grants 500,000 (500,000) 0
America 250th celebration 0 2,000,000 2,000,000
Total all funds $23,034,613 $91,192,294 $114,226,907
Less other funds 2,434,264 88,381,416 90,815,680
Total general fund $20,600,349 $2,810,878 $23,411,227
Full-time equivalent positions 83.50 2.00 85.50
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Temporary staff salaries and operating $10,225 $52,011 $62,236
Repatriation compliance costs 100,000 0 100,000
Pembina state museum exhibits 0 638,000 638,000
Underrepresented community program 0 75,000 75,000
Military gallery expansion project 0 77,944,524 77,944,524
Inspiration gallery updates 0 700,000 700,000
Medora area planning 0 2,000,000 2,000,000
State archive storage updates 207,500 0 207,500
Historical structures and buildings 0 3,000,000 3,000,000
improvements
Paul Bruhn historical revitalization grants 0 750,000 750,000
Historic museum repairs grant 0 200,000 200,000
Historic armory restoration grant 0 100,000 100,000
America 250th celebration 0 2,000,000 2,000,000
Total $317,725 $87,459,535 $87,777,260

H. B. NO. 1018 - PAGE 2
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The state
historical society may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - REVOLVING FUND. All fees collected by the state historical
society and deposited in the revolving fund established pursuant to section 55-03-04 are appropriated
to the state historical society for the purposes provided in chapter 55-03, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - GIFTS, GRANTS, AND BEQUESTS. All gifts, grants, devises,
bequests, donations, and assignments received by the state historical society and deposited with the
state treasurer pursuant to section 55-01-04 are appropriated to the state historical society for the
purposes provided in section 55-01-04, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027.
SECTION 6. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
MATCHING FUNDS REQUIREMENT.
1. The other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $27,488,000 from the
strategic investment and improvements fund, of which $638,000 is for Pembina state museum
exhibit designs and objects, $15,000,000 is for the military gallery expansion project,
$4,200,000 is for the repayment of a Bank of North Dakota line of credit for the military gallery
expansion project from the 2023-25 biennium, $350,000 is for an update to the inspiration
gallery at the North Dakota heritage center, $2,000,000 is for Medora area planning,
$3,000,000 is for improvements to historical structures and buildings, $200,000 is for a historic
museum repairs grant, $100,000 is for a historic armory restoration grant, and $2,000,000 is
for America 250th celebration activities, of which $1,000,000 is for state-related celebration
activities and $1,000,000 is for Medora-related celebration activities.
2. The state historical society may spend funds appropriated for the historic museum repairs
grant and historic armory restoration grant programs only to the extent the organizations have
secured one dollar of matching funds from nonstate sources for every two dollars provided by
the state historical society. The state historical society may accept matching funds raised
during or prior to the 2025-27 biennium for programs under this subsection.
3. The state historical society may access the $15,000,000 appropriated from the strategic
investment and improvements fund for the military gallery expansion project in section 1 of this
Act only upon certification from the director of the state historical society to the office of
management and budget that at least thirty-three percent, or $12,785,693, of the $38,744,524
appropriated from donations for the military gallery expansion project in section 1 of this Act,
has been pledged from nonstate sources for the project.
SECTION 7. OTHER FUNDS - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA LINE OF CREDIT - MILITARY
GALLERY EXPANSION PROJECT. The other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum
of $20,000,000, which the state historical society may borrow through a line of credit from the Bank of
North Dakota during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The interest rate
on the line of credit may not exceed the prevailing interest rate charged to North Dakota governmental
entities. If the state historical society accesses the line of credit, the state historical society shall request
a deficiency appropriation from the seventieth legislative assembly to repay the line of credit.
SECTION 8. OTHER FUNDS - DONATIONS. The other funds line item in section 1 of this Act
includes the sum of $39,094,524 from other funds derived from donations, of which $38,744,524 is for
the military gallery expansion project and $350,000 is for an update to the inspiration gallery at the
North Dakota heritage center.

H. B. NO. 1018 - PAGE 3
SECTION 9. OTHER FUNDS - DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION GRANT. The other funds
line item in section 1 of this Act includes $100,000 of grant funding from the department of
transportation for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Lewis and Clark interpretive center.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 55-01-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
55-01-02.1. Society to have jurisdiction over heritage center.
The society has jurisdiction over the administration and operations of the North Dakota heritage
center building. The director of the office of management and budget is responsible for maintenance of
the heritage center building. The society, in consultation with the adjutant general, is responsible for all
public displays, signage, and museum content for the military gallery within the North Dakota heritage
center building. The society and the adjutant general shall enter a memorandum of agreement to
establish policies on public displays, signage, and museum content for the military gallery. The
regimental room of the military gallery must be named the North Dakota national guard regimental
room. The society shall maintain the collections displayed and stored at the heritage center and shall
provide, or arrange, for the security of those collections. The society shall establish a policy that
authorizes the consumption of alcoholic beverages, including distilled spirits as defined in section
5-01-01, at the heritage center during an event that is open only to invited guests and if the alcoholic
beverages are dispensed by a qualified alcoholic beverage licensee.
SECTION 11. EMERGENCY. The following are declared to be an emergency measure:
1. $4,200,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund in section 1 of
this Act to repay a Bank of North Dakota line of credit for the military gallery expansion project;
and
2. $15,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund in section 1 of
this Act for the military gallery expansion project.

H. B. NO. 1018 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1018 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 64 Nays 27 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 4 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State